Utah statutes.
58-44a-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  engaging in practice as a certified nurse midwife when not licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter, or engaging in practice as a registered nurse when not licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter or Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;

(2)  representing or holding oneself out as a certified nurse midwife, nurse midwife, or identifying oneself by the initials C.N.M. or N.M. when not licensed under this chapter;

(3)  representing or holding out oneself as a registered nurse or identifying oneself by the initials R.N.  when not licensed under this chapter or Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act; and

(4)  using any other title, initials, or any other means indicating that one is licensed under this chapter.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 288, 1998 General Session

